Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2618
Venue.

Unless otherwise provided in the Nebraska
Uniform Adult Guardianship and Protective Proceedings Jurisdiction Act, the venue
for guardianship proceedings for an incapacitated person is in the place where
the incapacitated person resides or is present, or where property is located
if he or she is
a nonresident. If the incapacitated person is admitted to an institution pursuant
to order of a court of competent jurisdiction, venue is also in the county
in which that court sits.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 236, UPC § 5-302;

Laws 2011, LB157, § 36.

Nebraska Uniform Adult Guardianship and Protective Proceedings Jurisdiction Act, see section 30-3901.